Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 4 POWERSPORTS VEHICLES
44-20-411. Fees - disposition - expenses - expiration of licenses.

The fee established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall be collected with each application for each of the following:

Powersports vehicle dealer's license or used powersports vehicle dealer's license;

Powersports vehicle dealer's or used powersports vehicle dealer's license for each place of business in addition to the principal place of business;

Renewal or reissue of powersports vehicle dealer's license or used powersports vehicle dealer's license after change in location or lapse in principal place of business;

Powersports vehicle manufacturer's license;

Powersports vehicle distributor's license;

Powersports vehicle manufacturer representative's license;

Powersports vehicle salesperson's license including, without limitation, reissuing a license;

Wholesaler's license.

Fees shall be paid to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the auto dealers license fund created in section 44-20-133.

If an application for a wholesaler's, powersports vehicle dealer's, used powersports vehicle dealer's, or powersports salesperson's license is withdrawn by the applicant prior to issuance of the license, one-half of the license fee shall be refunded.

Licenses issued under this part 4, if not suspended or revoked, shall be valid until one year following the month of issuance thereof and shall then expire; except that any license issued under this part 4 shall expire upon the voluntary surrender thereof or upon the abandonment of the licensee's place of business for a period of more than thirty days.

Thirty days before the expiration of a license, the director shall mail to the licensee's business address of record a notice stating when the person's license is due to expire and the fee necessary to renew the license. For a powersports vehicle salesperson or powersports vehicle manufacturer representative, the notice shall be mailed to the address of the powersports vehicle dealer, used powersports vehicle dealer, or powersports vehicle manufacturer where the person is licensed.

Upon the expiration of a license, unless suspended or revoked, it may be renewed upon the payment of the application fees specified in this section and renewal shall be made from year to year as a matter of right; except that, if a wholesaler or powersports vehicle dealer voluntarily surrenders its license or abandons its place of business for a period of more than thirty days, the licensee is required to file a new application to renew its license.

Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a) of this section, a person has a thirty-day grace period after the license expires in which the license may be renewed pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of this section, so long as the person has a bond in full force and effect that complies with the applicable bonding requirements of section 44-20-412 or 44-20-413 during the thirty-day period. A person applying during the thirty-day grace period shall pay a late fee established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

The board shall propose, as part of its annual budget request, an adjustment in the amount of each fee that the board is authorized by law to collect. The budget request and the adjusted fees for the board shall reflect direct and indirect costs.

Based upon any appropriation made and subject to the approval of the executive director, the board shall adjust the fees collected by the executive director so that the revenue generated from fees covers the direct and indirect costs of administering this part 4. The fees shall remain in effect for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made.

In any year, if money appropriated by the general assembly to the board for its activities for the prior fiscal year is unexpended, the money shall be made a part of the appropriation to the board for the next fiscal year, and the amount shall not be raised from fees collected by the board or the executive director. If a supplemental appropriation is made by the general assembly to the board for its activities, the fees of the board and the executive director, when adjusted for the fiscal year next following that in which the supplemental appropriation was made, shall be adjusted by an additional amount that is sufficient to compensate for the supplemental appropriation. Money appropriated to the board in the annual general appropriation bill shall be from the fund provided in section 44-20-133.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 106, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-511 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-412. Bond of licensee.

To be issued a wholesaler's license, powersports vehicle dealer's license, or used powersports vehicle dealer's license, an applicant must procure and file with the board evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101 or a good and sufficient bond with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business within the state, approved as to form by the attorney general, and conditioned that the applicant not practice fraud or violate any of the provisions of this part 4 related to fraud or any rule promulgated by the board under this part 4 related to fraud. A powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer need not furnish an additional bond, savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit under this section if the dealer furnishes a bond, savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit under section 44-20-112.

The purpose of the bond procured by the applicant in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and section 44-20-413 is to provide for the reimbursement for any loss or damage suffered by any retail consumer caused by fraud or by a violation of this part 4 related to fraud by a wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, or used powersports vehicle dealer. For a wholesale transaction, the bond is available to each party to the transaction; except that, if a retail consumer is involved, the consumer has priority to recover from the bond. The amount of the bond must be fifty thousand dollars for each wholesaler applicant, powersports vehicle dealer applicant, and used powersports vehicle dealer applicant. The aggregate liability of the surety for all transactions does not exceed the amount of the bond, regardless of the number of claims or claimants.

No corporate surety is required to make a payment to any person making a claim under the bond until a final determination of fraud has been made by the board or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Bonds required pursuant to this section shall be renewed annually when the bondholder's license is renewed. Bonds may be renewed through a continuation certificate issued by the surety.

Nothing in this part 4 shall interfere with the authority of the courts to administer and conduct an interpleader action for claims against a licensee's bond.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 108, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 20-140), ch. 225, p. 1104, § 5, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-512 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-413. Powersports vehicle salesperson's bond.

To be issued a powersports vehicle salesperson's license, the applicant must procure and file with the board evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101 or a good and sufficient bond in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business within the state, approved as to form by the attorney general, and conditioned that the applicant perform in good faith as a powersports vehicle salesperson without fraud and without violating a provision of this part 4 related to fraud or any rule promulgated by the board under this part 4 related to fraud. The board shall implement a psychometrically valid and reliable salesperson exam that measures the minimum level of competence necessary to practice. A powersports vehicle salesperson need not furnish an additional bond, savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit under this section if the salesperson furnishes a bond, savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit under section 44-20-113.

No corporate surety is required to make a payment to any person claiming under the bond until a final determination of fraud has been made by the board or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Bonds required under this section shall be renewed annually when the bondholder's license is renewed. Bonds may be renewed through a continuation certificate issued by the surety.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 109, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 20-140), ch. 225, p. 1105, § 6, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-513 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-414. Notice of claims honored against bond.

A corporate surety that has provided a bond to a licensee pursuant to section 44-20-412 or 44-20-413 shall provide notice to the board and director of any claim that is honored against the bond within thirty days after the claim is honored.

A notice provided by a corporate surety pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be in the form required by the director, subject to approval by the board, and must include the name of the licensee, the name and address of the claimant, the amount of the honored claim, and the nature of the claim against the licensee.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 109, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-514 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-415. Testing licensees.

All persons applying for a wholesaler's, powersports vehicle dealer's, used powersports vehicle dealer's, or powersports vehicle salesperson's license under this part 4 shall be examined for their knowledge of the powersports vehicle laws of the state of Colorado and the rules promulgated pursuant to this part 4. If the applicant is a corporation, the managing officer shall take the examination, and, if the applicant is a partnership, all the general partners shall take the examination. No license shall be issued except upon successful passing of the examination. This section shall not apply to a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, or motor vehicle salesperson licensed pursuant to part 1 of this article 20.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 109, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-515 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-416. Filing of written warranties.

A licensed powersports vehicle manufacturer shall file with the director all written warranties and changes in written warranties the manufacturer makes on powersports vehicles or parts thereof. A licensed powersports vehicle manufacturer shall file with the director a copy of the delivery and preparation obligations of a powersports vehicle manufacturer's dealer, and these warranties and obligations constitute the powersports vehicle dealer's only responsibility for product liability as between the powersports vehicle dealer and the powersports vehicle manufacturer. Any mechanical, body, or parts defects arising from express or implied warranties of the powersports vehicle manufacturer constitute the powersports vehicle manufacturer's product or warranty liability, and the powersports vehicle manufacturer shall reasonably compensate any authorized powersports vehicle dealer who performs work to rectify a powersports vehicle manufacturer's product or warranty defects.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 110, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-516 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-417. Application - fingerprint-based criminal history record check - rules.

An application for a wholesaler's license, powersports vehicle dealer's license, used powersports vehicle dealer's license, or powersports vehicle salesperson's license shall be submitted to the board.

An application for a powersports vehicle distributor, powersports vehicle manufacturer representative, or powersports vehicle manufacturer license shall be submitted to the director.

Fees for licenses shall be paid at the time of the filing of the application for a license.

Persons applying for a powersports vehicle dealer's license shall file with the board a certified copy of a certificate of appointment as a powersports vehicle dealer from a powersports vehicle manufacturer.

A person applying for a powersports vehicle manufacturer's or distributor's license must:

File with the director a certified copy of a typical sales, service, and parts agreement with all powersports vehicle dealers; and

File evidence of the appointment of an agent for process in the state of Colorado.

Within sixty days after amending or modifying or adding an addendum to the sales, service, or parts agreement of more than one powersports dealer, a licensed manufacturer or distributor shall file a certified copy of the new sales, service, and parts agreement, including the changes, with the director if the amendment, modification, or addendum materially alters the rights and obligations of the contracting parties.

Persons applying for a wholesaler's, powersports vehicle dealer's, used powersports vehicle dealer's, or a powersports vehicle salesperson's license shall file with the board a written instrument in which the applicant shall appoint the secretary of the board as the agent of the applicant upon whom all process may be served in any action against the applicant arising out of a claim for damages suffered by a violation of this part 4, rules promulgated under this part 4, or any condition of the applicant's bond.

A person applying for a wholesaler's license or used powersports vehicle dealer's license shall file with the board a certification that the applicant has met the educational requirements for licensure under this subsection (7), unless the applicant is licensed as a motor vehicle dealer or a used motor vehicle dealer. This subsection (7) shall not apply to a person who has held a license, within the last three years, as a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, wholesaler, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, powersports vehicle dealer, or used powersports vehicle dealer under this part 4 or part 1 of this article 20.

An applicant for a wholesaler's license or used powersports vehicle dealer's license shall not be licensed unless one of the following persons has completed an eight-hour prelicensing education program:

The managing officer if the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company;

All of the general partners if the applicant is any form of partnership; or

The owner or managing officer if the applicant is a sole proprietorship.

The prelicensing education program shall include, without limitation, state and federal statutes and rules governing the sale of powersports vehicles.

A prelicensing education program shall not fulfill the requirements of this section unless approved by the board. The board shall approve any program with a curriculum that reasonably covers the material required by this section within eight hours.

The board may adopt rules establishing reasonable fees to be charged for the prelicensing education program.

The board may adopt reasonable rules to implement this section, including, without limitation, rules that govern:

The content and subject matter of education;

The criteria, standards, and procedures for the approval of courses and course instructors;

The training facility requirements; and

The methods of instruction.

An approved prelicensing program provider shall issue a certificate to a person who successfully completes the approved prelicensing education program. The current certificate of completion, or a copy of the certificate, shall be posted conspicuously at the dealership's principal place of business.

An approved prelicensing program provider shall submit a certificate to the director for each person who successfully completes the prelicensing education program. The certificate may be transmitted electronically.

With the submission of an application for any license issued under this part 4, each applicant shall submit a complete set of fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation or the auto industry division for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The board or the executive director shall use the information resulting from the fingerprint-based criminal history record check to investigate and determine whether an applicant is qualified to be licensed. The board or the executive director may verify the information an applicant is required to submit. The applicant shall pay the costs associated with the fingerprint-based criminal history record check to the Colorado bureau of investigation.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of an applicant performed pursuant to this subsection (8) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the department shall require that applicant to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

This subsection (8) does not apply to a publicly traded company or the company's subsidiary.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 110, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(8)(a.5) added, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 563, § 63, effective April 18.

L. 2022:

(8)(a.5) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 535, § 59, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-517 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-418. Notice of change of address or status.

The board, through the executive director, shall not issue a powersports vehicle dealer's license or used powersports vehicle dealer's license to an applicant who has no principal place of business. If a powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer changes the site or location of the dealer's principal place of business, the dealer shall immediately notify the board in writing, and thereupon, a new license shall be granted for the unexpired portion of the term of the existing license at a fee established pursuant to section 44-20-411. If a powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer ceases to possess a principal place of business where the dealer conducts the business for which the dealer is licensed, the dealer shall immediately notify the board in writing and, upon demand by the board, shall deliver the dealer's license, which shall be held and retained until it appears to the board that the licensee possesses a principal place of business; whereupon, the dealer's license shall be reissued. Nothing in this part 4 shall be construed to prevent a powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer from conducting the business for which the dealer is licensed at one or more sites or locations not contiguous to the dealer's principal place of business but operated and maintained in conjunction therewith.

If a powersports vehicle dealer changes to a new line-make of powersports vehicles, adds another franchise for the sale of new powersports vehicles, or cancels or otherwise loses a franchise for the sale of new powersports vehicles, the dealer shall immediately notify the board. If a franchise is canceled or lost, the board shall determine whether the dealer should be licensed as a used powersports vehicle dealer.

If the powersports vehicle dealer no longer possesses a franchise to sell new powersports vehicles, the board shall cancel and the powersports vehicle dealer shall deliver to it the dealer's license, and the board shall direct the director to issue to the dealer a used powersports vehicle dealer's license.

Upon the cancellation or loss of a franchise to sell new powersports vehicles and the relicensing of the dealer as a used powersports vehicle dealer, the dealer may continue in the business of a powersports vehicle dealer for a time, not exceeding six months after the relicensing of the dealer, to enable the dealer to dispose of the stock of new powersports vehicles on hand at the time of relicensing, but not otherwise.

If a powersports vehicle salesperson is discharged, leaves an employer, or changes a place of employment, the powersports vehicle dealer who last employed the salesperson shall confiscate and return the salesperson's license to the board. Upon being reemployed as a powersports vehicle salesperson, the powersports vehicle salesperson shall notify the board. Upon receiving the notification, the board shall issue a new license for the unexpired portion of the returned license after collecting a fee set pursuant to section 44-20-411 (5). It shall be unlawful for the salesperson to act as a powersports vehicle salesperson until a new license is procured.

Upon a change of place of business or business address, a wholesaler shall immediately notify the board of the change.

Except as specified in subsection (5)(d) of this section:

A person holding an ownership interest in a licensed corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other business entity shall not sell the interest to a person who does not already own an interest in the business entity until the owner applies to the board to be approved to hold an ownership interest in the business entity and the board approves the person to hold the interest.

A licensed corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other business entity shall notify the board within ten days after a transfer, other than a sale, of any ownership that results in a new person holding an interest in the business entity. To continue to hold ownership in the business, the transferee shall apply to the board for approval to continue holding an ownership interest in the business entity.

To be approved by the board to hold an ownership interest in a licensed business entity, the new owner must demonstrate the qualifications necessary for licensing, including a fingerprint-based criminal history record check, in accordance with this part 4.

If the board does not approve a person to hold an ownership interest in a licensed business entity, the person shall transfer the interest within six months after acquiring the ownership interest.

This subsection (5)(c) does not authorize a person to hold an interest in a licensed business entity when the person acquired the interest as the result of a sale that violates subsection (5)(a)(I) of this section.

This subsection (5) does not apply to the sale or transfer of an interest in a publicly traded company.

This subsection (5) does not apply to the sale of an interest to an institutional investor of a business entity that is subject to the reporting requirements of the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", 15 U.S.C. sec. 78a et seq., as amended. For the purposes of this subsection (5)(d)(II), "institutional investor" means an entity, such as a pension fund, endowment fund, insurance company, commercial bank, or mutual fund, that invests money on behalf of its members or clients and that is required by the United States securities and exchange commission to file a form 13F, or its successor form, to report quarterly holdings.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 112, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-518 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-419. Principal place of business - requirements.

The building or structure required to be located on a principal place of business shall have electrical service and adequate sanitary facilities.

A room in a hotel, rooming house, or apartment house building or a part of any single or multiple unit dwelling house shall not be used as a principal place of business unless the entire ground floor of the hotel, apartment house, or rooming house building or the dwelling house is devoted principally to and occupied for commercial purposes and the office of the dealer is located on the ground floor thereof.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt a powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer from local zoning ordinances.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 114, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-519 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-420. Licenses - grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation.

A powersports vehicle manufacturer's or distributor's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Material misstatement in an application for a license;

Willful failure to comply with this part 4 or any rule promulgated by the executive director under this part 4;

Engaging, in the past or present, in any illegal business practice.

A powersports vehicle manufacturer representative's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Material misstatement in an application for a license;

Willful failure to comply with this part 4 or any rules promulgated by the executive director under this part 4;

Committing any unconscionable business practice under title 4;

Having coerced or attempted to coerce a powersports vehicle dealer to accept delivery of any powersports vehicle, parts or accessories therefore, or any other commodities or services that have not been ordered by the dealer;

Having coerced or attempted to coerce a powersports vehicle dealer to enter into any agreement to do an act unfair to the dealer by threatening to cause the cancellation of the dealer's franchise;

Having withheld, threatened to withhold, reduced, or delayed without just cause an order for powersports vehicles, parts or accessories therefore, or any other commodities or services that have been ordered by a powersports vehicle dealer; or

Engaging, in the past or present, in any illegal business practice.

A wholesaler's license, powersports vehicle dealer's license, or a used powersports vehicle dealer's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Material misstatement in an application for a license;

Willful failure to comply with this part 4 or any rule promulgated by the executive director under this part 4;

Having been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any felony or crime pursuant to article 3, 4, or 5 of title 18 or any like crime pursuant to federal law or the law of another state. A certified copy of the judgment of conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction in a hearing held pursuant to this article 20.

Defrauding any buyer, seller, powersports vehicle salesperson, or financial institution to the person's damage;

Intentionally or negligently failing to perform any written agreement with any buyer or seller;

Failing or refusing to furnish and keep in force a bond required under this part 4;

Making a fraudulent or illegal sale, transaction, or repossession;

Willfully misrepresenting, circumventing, concealing, or failing to disclose, through subterfuge or device, any of the material particulars or the nature thereof required to be stated or furnished to the buyer;

Intentionally publishing or circulating advertising that is misleading or inaccurate in any material particular or that misrepresents a product sold or furnished by a licensed dealer;

Knowingly purchasing, selling, or otherwise acquiring or disposing of a stolen powersports vehicle;

Engaging in the business for which the dealer is licensed without at all times maintaining a principal place of business as required by this part 4 during reasonable business hours;

Engaging in the business through employment of an unlicensed powersports vehicle salesperson;

Willfully violating any state or federal law respecting commerce or powersports vehicles, or any lawful rule respecting commerce or powersports vehicles promulgated by any licensing or regulating authority pertaining to powersports vehicles, under circumstances in which the act constituting the violation directly and necessarily involves commerce or powersports vehicles;

Representing or selling as a new and unused powersports vehicle any powersports vehicle that the dealer or salesperson knows is otherwise a used powersports vehicle;

Committing a fraudulent insurance act pursuant to section 10-1-128;

Failing to give notice to a prospective buyer of the acceptance or rejection of a powersports vehicle purchase order agreement within a reasonable time period, as determined by the board, when the licensee is working with the prospective buyer on a finance sale or a consignment sale.

A wholesaler's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked for the selling, leasing, or offering or attempting to negotiate the sale, lease, or exchange of an interest in motor vehicles to persons other than powersports vehicle dealers, used powersports vehicle dealers, or other wholesalers.

The license of a powersports vehicle salesperson may be denied, revoked, or suspended on the following grounds:

Material misstatement in an application for a license;

Failure to comply with any provision of this part 4 or any rule promulgated by the board or executive director under this part 4;

Engaging in the business for which the licensee is licensed without having in force and effect a good and sufficient bond with corporate surety as provided in this part 4;

Intentionally publishing or circulating an advertisement that is misleading or inaccurate in any material particular or that misrepresents a powersports vehicle product sold or attempted to be sold by the salesperson;

Having indulged in any fraudulent business practice;

Selling, offering, or attempting to negotiate the sale, exchange, or lease of powersports vehicles for a powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer for which the salesperson is not licensed; except that negotiation with a powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer for the sale, exchange, or lease of new and used powersports vehicles, by a salesperson compensated for the negotiation by a powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer for which the salesperson is licensed shall not be grounds for denial, revocation, or suspension;

Representing oneself as a salesperson for a powersports vehicle dealer when the salesperson is not so employed and licensed;

Having been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any felony or any crime pursuant to article 3, 4, or 5 of title 18 or any like crime pursuant to federal law or the law of another state. A certified copy of the judgment of conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction in a hearing held pursuant to this article 20.

Having knowingly purchased, sold, or otherwise acquired or disposed of a stolen powersports vehicle;

Employing an unlicensed powersports vehicle salesperson;

Defrauding any retail buyer to the person's damage;

Representing or selling as a new and unused powersports vehicle a powersports vehicle that the salesperson knows is otherwise a used powersports vehicle;

Willfully violating any state or federal law respecting commerce or powersports vehicles, or any lawful rule respecting commerce or powersports vehicles promulgated by any licensing or regulating authority pertaining to powersports vehicles, under circumstances in which the act constituting the violation directly and necessarily involves commerce or powersports vehicles;

Improperly withholding, misappropriating, or converting to the salesperson's own use any money belonging to customers or other persons received in the course of employment as a powersports vehicle salesperson.

A license issued pursuant to this part 4 may be denied, revoked, or suspended if unfitness of the licensee or licensee applicant is shown in the following:

The licensing character or record of the licensee or licensee applicant;

The criminal character or record of the licensee or licensee applicant;

The financial character or record of the licensee or licensee applicant;

A violation of any lawful order of the board.

The license of a powersports vehicle dealer may be denied, revoked, suspended, or otherwise subject to discipline imposed under this part 4 if an owner is acting as a salesperson without a motor vehicle salesperson license and the owner commits any of the acts or omissions that subject a salesperson's license to denial, revocation, or suspension under subsection (6) of this section.

A license issued or applied for pursuant to this part 4 shall be revoked or denied if the licensee or applicant has been convicted of or pleaded no contest to any of the following offenses in this state or another jurisdiction during the previous ten years:

A felony in violation of article 3, 4, or 5 of title 18 or any similar crime under federal law or the law of another state; or

A crime involving salvage fraud or the defrauding of a retail consumer in a powersports vehicle sale or lease transaction.

A certified copy of a judgment of conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of an offense under subsection (8)(a)(I) of this section is conclusive evidence of the conviction in any hearing held pursuant to this article 20.

A person whose license issued under this part 4 is revoked or who surrenders a license to avoid discipline is ineligible to apply for a new license under this part 4 for one year after the date of revocation or surrender of the license.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 114, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-520 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-421. Procedure for denial, suspension, or revocation of license - judicial review.

The denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses issued under this part 4 shall be in accordance with the provisions of sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105; except that the discovery available under rule 26 (b)(2) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure is available in any proceeding.

The board shall appoint an administrative law judge pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24 to conduct any hearing concerning the licensing or discipline of a wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, used powersports vehicle dealer, powersports vehicle manufacturer, powersports vehicle manufacturer representative, or powersports vehicle distributor; except that the board may, upon a unanimous vote of the members present when the vote is taken, conduct the hearing in lieu of appointing an administrative law judge.

The board shall assign a hearing concerning the licensing or discipline of a powersports vehicle salesperson to the executive director, who shall appoint an officer to conduct a hearing.

Hearings conducted before an administrative law judge shall be in accordance with the rules of procedure of the office of administrative courts. Hearings conducted before an officer appointed by the executive director shall be in accordance with the rules of procedure established by the executive director.

The board may summarily suspend a licensee required to post a bond under this article 20 if the licensee does not have a bond in full force and effect as required by this article 20. The suspension shall become effective upon the earlier of the licensee receiving notice of the suspension or within three days after the notice of suspension is mailed to a licensee's last-known address on file with the board. The notice may be effected by certified mail or personal delivery.

The court of appeals shall have initial jurisdiction to review all final actions and orders that are subject to judicial review of the board. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with section 24-4-106 (11).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 118, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-521 as it existed prior to 2018.